California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) The pharmacist-in-charge did not permit, encourage, approve of, either tacitly or implicitly or through willful ignorance, any conduct committed by another person that violated state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the practice of pharmacy.

(c) The pharmacist-in-charge reported the violation, or suspected violation, of any state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the practice of pharmacy to the board as soon as reasonably possible following the discovery of the violation.

(d) The pharmacist-in-charge took all actions reasonably necessary to stop and remedy the violation, or suspected violation, of any state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the practice of pharmacy as soon as reasonably possible following the discovery of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4307.

(a) Any person who has been denied a license or whose license has been revoked or is under suspension, or who has failed to renew his or her license while it was under suspension, or who has been a manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or any other person with management or control of any partnership, corporation, trust, firm, or association whose application for a license has been denied or revoked, is under suspension or has been placed on probation, and while acting as the manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or any other person with management or control had knowledge of or knowingly participated in any conduct for which the license was denied, revoked, suspended,
 or placed on probation, shall be prohibited from serving as a manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or in any other position with management or control of a licensee as follows:

(1) Where a probationary license is issued or where an existing license is placed on probation, this prohibition shall remain in effect for a period not to exceed five years.

(2) Where the license is denied or revoked, the prohibition shall continue until the license is issued or reinstated.

(b) “Manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or any other person with management or control of a license” as used in this section and Section 4308, may refer to a pharmacist or to any other person who serves in such capacity in or for a licensee.

(c) The provisions of subdivision (a) may be alleged in any pleading filed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code. However, no order may be issued in that case except as to a person who is named in the caption, as to whom the pleading alleges the applicability of this section, and where the person has been given notice of the proceeding as required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code. The authority to proceed as provided by this subdivision shall be in addition to the board’s authority to proceed under Section 4339 or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 38.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4308.

Whenever a person is prohibited from serving as a manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or in any other position with management or control of a licensee as provided by Section 4307, the board shall, in each case where it has that information, notify in writing each licensee for whom the person is a manager, administrator, owner, member, officer, director, associate, partner, or in any other position with management or control of the prohibition. The board shall send the notification to the licensee’s address of record. The licensee shall have 30 days from the date that the notice is sent to remove and replace the prohibited person and, where appropriate, file a change of permit to reflect that
 change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 39.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4309.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or suspended or who has been placed on probation may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a revoked license.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The petition shall state any facts required by the board, and the petition shall be accompanied by two or more verified recommendations from holders of licenses issued by the board to which the petition is addressed, and two or more recommendations from citizens, each having personal knowledge of the disciplinary penalty imposed by the board and the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(c) The petition may be heard by the board sitting with an administrative law judge, or a committee of the board sitting with an administrative law judge, or the board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge. Where the petition is heard by a committee of the board sitting with an administrative law judge or by an administrative law judge sitting alone, the decision shall be subject to review by the board pursuant to Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(d) In considering reinstatement or modification of penalty, the board, committee of the board, or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider factors including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) All the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken.

(2) The offense for which the petitioner was disciplined.

(3) The petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing.

(4) The petitioner’s documented rehabilitative efforts.

(5) The petitioner’s general reputation for truth and professional ability.

(e) The hearing may be continued from time to time as the board, committee of the board, or the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(f) The board, committee of the board, or administrative law judge may impose necessary terms and conditions on the licensee in reinstating the license.

(g) No petition under this section shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to amend or otherwise change the effect or application of Sections 822 and 823.

(i) The board may investigate any and all matters pertaining to the petition and documents submitted with or in connection with the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4310.

Immediately upon the denial of any application for a license the board shall notify the applicant in writing. Within 10 days after the board mails the notice, the applicant may present his or her written petition for a license to the board. Upon receipt by the board of the written petition, proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4311.

(a) Any license issued by the board, or the holder thereof, shall be suspended automatically during any time that the person is incarcerated after conviction of a felony, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed. The board, immediately upon receipt of a certified copy of a record of a criminal conviction, shall determine whether the person has been automatically suspended by virtue of incarceration pursuant to a felony conviction and, if so, the duration of that suspension. The board shall notify the person so suspended of the suspension and that the person has a right to request a hearing, solely as to whether he or she is incarcerated pursuant to a felony conviction, in writing at that person’s address of record with the board and at the facility in which the person is incarcerated.

(b) In addition to any suspension under subdivision (a), the board shall summarily suspend any license issued by the board where a conviction of the holder of the license meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(1) A felony that was either of the following:

(A) Committed in the course of a business or practice for which the board issues a license.

(B) Committed in a manner that a client, customer, or patient of the licensee was a victim.

(2) Where an element of the offense involves either of the following:

(A) The specific intent to deceive, defraud, steal, or make a false statement.

(B) The illegal sale or possession for sale of or trafficking in any controlled substance.

(3) The suspension shall continue until the time for appeal has elapsed, if no appeal is taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the board.

(4) The board shall immediately send notice in writing of the suspension to the licensee, or the holder of any other board-issued license, at his or her address of record and, if incarcerated at the time, at the facility in which the person is incarcerated. The notice shall include notification of that person’s right to elect to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), and of the right to request a hearing to contest the summary suspension. Any request for a hearing under this paragraph must be received by the board within 15 days following receipt of the notice provided for by this paragraph.

(5) The hearing shall be before an administrative law judge, a committee of the board sitting with an administrative law judge, or the board sitting with an administrative law judge, at the board’s discretion, and shall be subject to review by the board, at its discretion. The hearing shall be limited to (A) whether there has been a felony conviction as stated in the board’s notice, and (B) whether the conviction meets the criteria of this subdivision, except where the licensee chooses to proceed as provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or where the board has also filed and served an accusation as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and given notice of the hearing as required by that chapter; provided that if an accusation under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is also to be heard, only an administrative law judge sitting alone or the board, sitting with an administrative law judge, may hear the case.

(c) In addition to any suspension under subdivision (a), the board shall also suspend any license issued by the board, or the holder thereof, if the board determines that the felony conviction of the holder of the license is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee.

(1) Notice of the board’s determination shall be sent to the licensee, or the holder thereof, at that person’s address of record with the board and, if the person is incarcerated at the time, the facility in which the person is incarcerated. The notice shall advise the person that the license shall be suspended without hearing unless, within 15 days following receipt of the notice, a written request for hearing is delivered to the board.

(2) Upon receipt of a timely request for hearing, a notice of hearing shall be sent to the person at least 10 days before the date scheduled for the hearing. The notice of hearing shall include notification of that person’s right to elect to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) The hearing to determine whether a felony conviction is substantially related for purposes of an interim suspension under this subdivision shall be separate from any hearing on an accusation under the Administrative Procedure Act, except where the licensee elects to proceed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or where the board has filed and served an accusation as provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and given notice of hearing as required by that chapter. The hearing on whether the felony conviction is substantially related shall be heard either by an administrative law judge sitting alone, by a committee of the board sitting with an administrative law judge, or by the board sitting with an administrative law judge, at the board’s discretion, and shall be subject to review by the board, at its discretion. However, if an accusation under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is also to be heard, only an administrative law judge sitting alone or the board, sitting with an administrative law judge, may hear the case. Except where a person proceeds under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or the board proceeds with an accusation at the same time, any suspension imposed under this subdivision shall continue until an accusation is filed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and a final decision is rendered by the board.

(4) A conviction of any crime referred to in Section 4301, or for violation of Section 187, 261, or 288 of the Penal Code, shall be conclusively presumed to be substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee of the board. Upon its own motion or for good cause shown the board may decline to impose a suspension under this subdivision or may set aside a suspension previously imposed when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of and confidence in the practice of pharmacy and the handling of dangerous drugs and devices.

(d) (1) Discipline may be ordered in accordance with Section 4300 or an application denied when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(2) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge sitting alone or with a committee of the board or with the board itself, at the board’s discretion, and any decision shall be subject to review by the board, at its discretion. The hearing shall not be held until the judgment of conviction has become final or, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, an order granting probation has been made suspending the imposition of sentence, provided that a licensee may, at his or her option, elect to have the issue of penalty decided before those time periods have elapsed. Where the licensee so elects, the issue of penalty shall be heard in the manner described in this section at the hearing to determine whether the conviction was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee. If the conviction of a licensee who has made this election is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically cease. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause, including the facts underlying the conviction, other than the overturned conviction.

(3) The record of the proceedings resulting in the criminal conviction, including a transcript of any testimony taken in connection with the proceeding, may be received in evidence in any administrative proceeding to the extent the testimony would otherwise be admissible under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A certified copy of the criminal conviction shall be conclusive proof of the fact of the conviction.

(e) Other provisions of this chapter setting forth procedures for the suspension or revocation of a license issued by the board shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this section, except as specifically provided in this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, a crime is a felony if it is specifically declared to be so or is made a felony by subdivision (a) of Section 17 of the Penal Code, unless it is charged as a misdemeanor pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 17 of the Penal Code, irrespective of whether in a particular case the crime may be considered a misdemeanor as a result of postconviction proceedings. For purposes of this section, a felony also includes a conviction under federal law, or the law of any other state of the United States, of the District of Columbia, or of any territory or possession of the United States. A conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(g) The board may delegate the authority to issue a suspension under subdivision (a) or (b) or a notice of suspension under subdivision (c) to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4312.

(a) The board may cancel the license of a facility that is licensed by the board if the licensed premises remain closed, as defined in subdivision (e), other than by order of the board. For good cause shown, the board may cancel a license after a shorter period of closure. To cancel a license pursuant to this subdivision, the board shall make a diligent, good faith effort to give notice by personal service on the licensee. If a written objection is not received within 10 days after personal service is made or a diligent, good faith effort to give notice by personal service on the licensee has failed, the board may cancel the license without the necessity of a hearing. If the licensee files a written objection, the board shall file an accusation based on the licensee remaining closed. Proceedings shall be conducted in accordance
 with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted in that chapter.

(b) If a facility license is canceled pursuant to subdivision (a) or revoked pursuant to this article, or a facility notifies the board of its intent to remain closed or to discontinue business, the licensee shall, within 10 days thereafter, arrange for the transfer of all dangerous drugs and controlled substances or dangerous devices to another licensee authorized to possess the dangerous drugs and controlled substances or dangerous devices. The licensee transferring the dangerous drugs and controlled substances or dangerous devices shall immediately confirm in writing to the board that the transfer has taken place.

(c) If a licensed facility fails to comply with subdivision (b), the board may seek and obtain an
 order from the superior court in the county in which the facility licensed by the board is located, authorizing the board to enter the facility and inventory and store, transfer, sell, or arrange for the sale of, all dangerous drugs and controlled substances and dangerous devices found in the facility.

(d) If the board sells or arranges for the sale of any dangerous drugs, controlled substances, or dangerous devices pursuant to subdivision (c), the board may retain from the proceeds of the sale an amount equal to the cost to the board of obtaining and enforcing an order issued pursuant to subdivision (c), including the cost of disposing of the dangerous drugs, controlled substances, or dangerous devices. The remaining proceeds, if any, shall be returned to the licensee from whose premises the dangerous drugs or controlled substances or dangerous devices were removed.

(1) The
 licensee shall be notified of the licensee’s right to the remaining proceeds by personal service or by certified mail, postage prepaid.

(2) If a statute or regulation requires the licensee to file with the board the licensee’s address, and any change of address, the notice required by this subdivision may be sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the latest address on file with the board and service of notice in this manner shall be deemed completed on the 10th day after the mailing.

(3) If the licensee is notified as provided in this subdivision, and the licensee fails to contact the board for the remaining proceeds within 30 calendar days after personal service has been made or service by certified mail, postage prepaid, is deemed completed, the remaining proceeds shall be deposited by the board into the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund. These deposits shall be deemed to have
 been received pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be subject to claim or other disposition as provided in that chapter.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “closed” means not engaged in the ordinary activity for which a license has been issued for at least one day each calendar week during any 120-day period.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a pharmacy to be open seven days a week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 27.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4313.

In determining whether to grant an application for licensure or whether to discipline or reinstate a license, the board shall give consideration to evidence of rehabilitation. However, public protection shall take priority over rehabilitation and, where evidence of rehabilitation and public protection are in conflict, public protection shall take precedence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4314.

(a) The board may issue citations containing fines and orders of abatement for any violation of Section 733, for any violation of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or for any violation of Division 116 (commencing with Section 150200) of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with Sections 125.9, 148, and 4005 and the regulations adopted pursuant to those sections.

(b) Where appropriate, a citation issued by the board, as specified in this section, may subject the person or entity to whom the citation is issued to an administrative fine.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, where appropriate, a citation issued by the board
 may contain an order of abatement. The order of abatement shall fix a reasonable time for abatement of the violation. It may also require the person or entity to whom the citation is issued to demonstrate how future compliance with the Pharmacy Law, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, will be accomplished. A demonstration may include, but is not limited to, submission of a corrective action plan, and requiring completion of up to six hours of continuing education courses in the subject matter specified in the order of abatement. Any continuing education courses required by the order of abatement shall be in addition to those required for license renewal.

(d) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit the board from issuing a citation, fine, and order of abatement pursuant to Section 4067 or Section 56.36 of the Civil Code, and the regulations adopted pursuant to those sections.

(e) The issuance of a citation pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be construed as a disciplinary action or discipline for purposes of licensure or the reporting of discipline for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 28.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4315.

(a) The executive officer, or his or her designee, may issue a letter of admonishment to a licensee for failure to comply with Section 733, for failure to comply with this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or for failure to comply with Division 116 (commencing with Section 150200) of the Health and Safety Code, directing the licensee to come into compliance.

(b) The executive officer, or his or her designee, may issue a letter of admonishment to an applicant for licensure who has committed any violation of law that the board deems, in its discretion, does not merit the denial of a license or require probationary status under
 Section 4300. The letter of admonishment may be issued concurrently with a license.

(c) The letter of admonishment shall be in writing and shall describe in detail the nature and facts of the violation, including a reference to the statutes or regulations violated.

(d) The letter of admonishment shall inform the licensee or applicant that within 30 days of service of the order of admonishment the licensee or applicant may do either of the following:

(1) Submit a written request for an office conference to the executive officer of the board to contest the letter of admonishment.

(A) Upon a timely request, the executive officer, or his or her designee, shall
 hold an office conference with the licensee or applicant or his or her legal counsel or authorized representative. Unless so authorized by the executive officer, or his or her designee, no individual other than the legal counsel or authorized representative of the licensee or applicant may accompany the licensee or applicant to the office conference.

(B) Prior to or at the office conference, the licensee or applicant may submit to the executive officer declarations and documents pertinent to the subject matter of the letter of admonishment.

(C) The office conference is intended to be an informal proceeding
 and shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(D) The executive officer, or his or her designee, may affirm, modify, or withdraw the letter of admonishment. Within 14 calendar days from the date of the office conference, the executive officer, or his or her designee, shall personally serve or send the board’s written decision by certified mail to the licensee’s or applicant’s address of
 record. This decision shall be deemed the final administrative decision concerning the letter of admonishment.

(E) Judicial review of the decision may be had by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 30 days of the date the decision was personally served or sent by certified mail. The judicial review shall extend to the question of whether or not there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion in the issuance of the letter of admonishment.

(2) Comply with the letter of admonishment and, if required, submit a written corrective action plan to the executive officer documenting compliance.
 If an office conference is not requested pursuant to this section, compliance with the letter of admonishment shall not constitute an admission of the violation noted in the letter of admonishment.

(e) The letter of admonishment shall be served upon the licensee or applicant personally or by certified mail at his or her address of record with the board. If the licensee or applicant is served by certified mail, service shall be effective upon deposit in the United States mail.

(f) The licensee or applicant shall maintain and have readily available a copy of the letter of admonishment and corrective action plan, if any, for at least three years from the date of issuance of the letter of admonishment.

(g) Nothing in
 this section shall in any way limit the board’s authority or ability to do either of the following:

(1) Issue a citation pursuant to Section 125.9, 148, or 4067, or pursuant to Section 1775 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Institute disciplinary proceedings pursuant to this article.

(h) The issuance of a letter of admonishment pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be construed as a disciplinary action or discipline for purposes of licensure or the reporting of discipline for
 licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4316.

(a) The board, through its executive officer, is authorized to issue a cease and desist order for operating any facility under this chapter that requires licensure or for practicing any activity under this chapter that requires licensure without obtaining that licensure.

(b) Whenever the board issues a cease and desist order pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall immediately issue the facility a notice setting forth the acts or omissions with which it is charged, specifying the pertinent code section or sections and any regulations.

(c) The order shall provide that the facility, within 15 days of receipt of the notice, may request a hearing before the president of the board to contest the cease
 and desist order. Consideration of the facility’s contest of the cease and desist order shall comply with Section 11425.10 of the Government Code. The hearing shall be held no later than five business days from the date the request of the owner is received by the board. The president shall render a written decision within five business days of the hearing. In the absence of the president of the board, the vice president of the board may conduct the hearing permitted by this subdivision. The owner or person in possession or control of the facility may seek review of the decision of the president of the board pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 29.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4316.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board may assess administrative fines and issue orders of abatement to any unlicensed entity who engages in any action that requires licensure under the jurisdiction of the board, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.   (AB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4317.

The board may take an enforcement action against a chain community pharmacy, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4001, that violates Section 4113.7 unless, by clear and convincing evidence, the chain community pharmacy demonstrates that the violation was contrary to its policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4317.5.

(a) The board may bring an action for fines for repeated violations of materially similar provisions of this chapter within five years by three or more pharmacies operating under common ownership or management within a chain community pharmacy for a third or subsequent violation, which may be punished by an administrative fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation.

(b) The board may bring an action against a chain community pharmacy operating under common ownership or management for fines not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for any violation of this chapter demonstrated to be the result of a written policy or that was expressly
 encouraged by any owner or manager.

(c) The board shall not bring an action for fines pursuant to subdivision (a) until at least six months have elapsed from the date the board determines that a violation has occurred unless the violation giving rise to the action resulted in actual harm to any consumer or serious potential harm to the public.

(d) In an action brought by the board pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall be a defense for any pharmacy to establish either of the following:

(1) That the violation was contrary to a written policy that was communicated by any owner or manager to all employees of the pharmacies where the violation occurred, and that the pharmacy has complied with the policy.

(2) That, within six months after the violation, any owner or manager corrected all unlawful policies, communicated the change in policy or policies in writing to all pharmacies under its ownership or management, and provided proof of abatement of the violation to the board, so long as the violation did not result in actual harm to any consumer or serious potential harm to the public.

(e) In determining the amount of the fine sought in an action brought pursuant to this section, the board shall consider relevant mitigating and aggravating factors, including, but not limited to, the good faith of the licensee, the communication of written changes to unlawful policies, the gravity of the violation, the potential harm to patients, whether the violation affects the professional
 judgment or independence of pharmacists and pharmacy technicians, and the history of previous violations by the common owner or manager.

(f) The authority granted by this section is in addition to the authority of the board to institute any other administrative, civil, or criminal action.

(g) For purposes of this section, “chain community pharmacy” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 4001.

(h) The fines in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be imposed in accordance with Section 4314.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 47.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4317.6.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “mail order pharmacy” is defined as a nonresident pharmacy that dispenses medications and ships them to patients via the postal service or other mail delivery method.

(b) The board may bring an action for fines for repeated violations of materially similar provisions of this chapter within five years for a single mail order pharmacy, or multiple mail order pharmacies operating under common ownership or management for a third or subsequent violation, which may be punished by an administrative fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation.

(c) The
 board shall not bring an action for fines pursuant to subdivision (b) until at least six months have elapsed from the date the board determines that a violation has occurred unless the violation giving rise to the action resulted in actual harm to any consumer or serious potential harm to the public.

(d) In determining the amount of the fine sought in an action brought pursuant to this section, the board shall consider relevant mitigating and aggregating factors, including, but not limited to, the good faith of the licensee, the communication of written changes to unlawful policies, the gravity of the violation, the potential harm to a patient, whether the violation affects the professional judgment or independence of pharmacists, and the history of previous violations by the mail order pharmacy, or in the case of multiple mail order pharmacies
 operating under common ownership or management, the history of the previous violations by the common ownership or control.

(e) The authority granted by this section is in addition to the authority of the board to institute any other administrative, civil, or criminal action.

(f) The fines in subdivision (b) shall be imposed in accordance with Section 4314.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 48.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4318.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action concerning the manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(b) The board shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the
 licensee manufactured, transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(c) The board shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee solely because the licensee is licensed in another state and was convicted or disciplined in that state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other discipline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 9.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Prohibitions and Offenses [4320. - 4343.]

4320.

(a) The penalties prescribed in this chapter may be recovered in any court having jurisdiction, by a civil action instituted by the board in the name of the State of California, or by criminal prosecution upon complaint being made.

(b) The district attorney of the county wherein violations of this chapter occur shall conduct all felony prosecutions at the request of the board. The district attorney of the county or city attorney of the city wherein violations of this chapter occur shall conduct all other actions and prosecutions at the request of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4321.

(a) Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this chapter, when no other penalty is provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200), and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment of not less than 30 days nor exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) In all other instances, any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, when no other penalty is provided, is guilty of an infraction, and upon conviction thereof may be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).
